New York, session 2025-2026, S9029.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 96-g of the agriculture and markets law is amended 2 by adding three new subdivisions 18, 19 and 20 to read as follows: 3 18. "Lab grown meat" means a food product comprised of animal cells, 4 such as muscle or fat tissue. Such cells are derived from an initial 5 sample and are grown in a culture through cellular agriculture in a 6 controlled environment, such as a bioreactor. The resulting product is 7 biologically equivalent to conventional meat but is not the result of 8 the slaughter of an animal. 9 19. "3D printed meat" means a food product fabricated using additive 10 manufacturing technology, which involves the layer-by-layer deposition 11 of a specialized bio-ink. Such bio-ink is composed of either cultured 12 animal cells or proteins derived from botanical sources. 13 20. "Plant-based meat" means a food product formulated exclusively 14 from botanical sources, such as soy, pea protein, or wheat. Such ingre- 15 dients are subjected to food processing techniques, including high heat 16 and pressure extrusion. 17 § 2. Section 96-h of the agriculture and markets law, as added by 18 chapter 573 of the laws of 2002, is amended to read as follows: 19 § 96-h. Application of article. 1. Notwithstanding any other 20 provisions of this article, the knowing sale, exposure for sale, 21 exchange or transportation at any and all places within the state of the 22 fur, hair, skin or flesh of domesticated dog (canis familiaris) or 23 domesticated cat (felis catus or domesticus) as food, meat, custom 24 slaughtered meat, farm dressed meat, meat by-product or meat food prod- 25 uct edible by humans or animals is hereby prohibited. A violation of 26 this [section] subdivision shall subject the offender to a civil penalty 27 of up to one thousand dollars for an individual and up to five thousand EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14234-02-5 S. 9029 2 1 dollars for a corporation for the first violation. Any subsequent 2 violation shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to twenty-five thou- 3 sand dollars. Any civil penalties collected pursuant to this [section] 4 subdivision shall be paid to the animal population control fund estab- 5 lished by section ninety-seven-xx of the state finance law. Any authori- 6 zation given by or pursuant to the provisions of this article to handle, 7 sell, expose for sale, exchange or transport the carcasses of animals, 8 parts thereof, meat, meat by-products and meat food products within the 9 state and any exclusion from the application of this article applicable 10 to custom slaughtered meat or contained in section ninety-six-j or 11 another provision of this article shall not apply to the knowing sale, 12 exposure for sale, exchange or transportation of the fur, hair, skin or 13 flesh of domesticated dog or domesticated cat as food, meat, custom 14 slaughtered meat, farm dressed meat, meat by-product or meat food prod- 15 uct edible by humans or animals which is prohibited by the provisions of 16 this section. In the case of any conflict with another provision of this 17 article, the provisions of this [section] subdivision shall prevail over 18 such other provision of this article. 19 2. (a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, it shall 20 be unlawful for any person to manufacture for sale, sell, hold or offer 21 for sale, or distribute lab grown meat or 3D printed meat in this state. 22 The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to plant-based meat. 23 A person who knowingly violates this subdivision commits a class B 24 misdemeanor. A food establishment that manufactures, distributes, or 25 sells lab grown meat or 3D printed meat in violation of this subdivision 26 shall be subject to disciplinary action including a civil penalty of up 27 to one thousand dollars for an individual and up to five thousand 28 dollars for a corporation for the first violation. Any subsequent 29 violation shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to twenty-five thou- 30 sand dollars. Any civil penalties collected pursuant to this subdivision 31 shall be paid to the animal population control fund established by 32 section ninety-seven-xx of the state finance law. In addition to the 33 penalties provided in this subdivision the license of any restaurant, 34 store, or other business may be suspended as provided in the applicable 35 licensing law upon the conviction of an owner or employee of that busi- 36 ness for a violation of this subdivision in connection with that busi- 37 ness. A product found to be in violation of this subdivision is subject 38 to seizure and quarantine under the provisions of section two hundred 39 two-b of this chapter. The department may adopt rules to implement this 40 subdivision. 41 (b) The department is authorized to determine whether any food product 42 manufactured, sold, offered for sale, held for sale, distributed, or 43 transported within the state constitutes lab grown meat or 3D printed 44 meat, as defined in section ninety-six-g of this article. For purposes 45 of making such determination, the department may inspect any food estab- 46 lishment, facility, product, ingredient, process, record, or labeling 47 associated with the manufacture or distribution of such product, includ- 48 ing records sufficient to establish the origin and method of production 49 of the product. 50 (c) Where the department determines that a person, food establishment, 51 store or other business has violated this subdivision, the department 52 shall issue a written notice of violation setting forth the factual 53 basis for such determination and any penalties imposed. 54 (d) The department may establish standards, procedures, and documenta- 55 tion requirements necessary to implement and enforce this subdivision, 56 including requirements related to inspection, sampling, recordkeeping, S. 9029 3 1 and verification of compliance. Failure to comply with such standards or 2 to provide documentation required by the department shall constitute a 3 violation of this subdivision. 4 (e) Any person or food establishment, store or other business 5 aggrieved by a determination or penalty issued pursuant to this subdivi- 6 sion may seek judicial review pursuant to article seventy-eight of the 7 civil practice law and rules, provided that such proceeding is commenced 8 within thirty days of service of the notice of violation. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.